Utah statutes.
53A-11a-203.   Parental notification of certain incidents and threats required.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "parent" includes a student's guardian.

(2)  A school shall:

(a)  notify a parent if the parent's student threatens to commit suicide; or

(b)  notify the parents of each student involved in an incident of bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, hazing, or retaliation, of the incident involving each parent's student.

(3) (a)  If a school notifies a parent of an incident or threat required to be reported under Subsection (2), the school shall produce and maintain a record that verifies that the parent was notified of the incident or threat.

(b)  A school may not:

(i)  disclose a record described in Subsection (3)(a), including any information obtained to prepare the record, to a person other than a person authorized to receive the record described in Subsection (3)(c); or

(ii)  use a record described in Subsection (3)(a), including any information obtained to prepare the record, for the school's own purposes, including the following purposes:

(A)  for a report or study;

(B)  for a statistical analysis; or

(C)  to conduct research.

(c)  A school may disclose a record described in Subsection (3)(a), including any information obtained to prepare the record:

(i)  to the parent or the parent's student; or

(ii)  to a person if required to disclose the record or information to a person pursuant to the terms of a court order as described in Subsection 63G-2-202(7).

(4)  A school board shall adopt a policy regarding the process for:

(a)  notifying a parent as required in Subsection (2); and

(b)  producing and retaining a record that verifies that a parent was notified of an incident or threat as required in Subsection (3).

(5)  At the request of a parent, a school may provide information and make recommendations related to an incident or threat described in Subsection (2).



Enacted by Chapter 335, 2013 General Session

